apertium-mk-bg/apertium-mk-bg.bg.dix
	<pardef n="мълч/и__vblex"> <!-- imperf"/><s n="iv -->
	  <e>        <p>          <l>и</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ете</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>а</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>иш</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>и</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>им</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e r="LR"> 	   <p>          <l>име</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ите</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ат</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ах</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>ех</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еше</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еше</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ахме</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>ехме</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ахте</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>ехте</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>аха</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>еха</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ал</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>ел</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ала</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>ела</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ало</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>ело</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>али</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>ели</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ащ</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ащия</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ащият</l>       <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>аща</l>       <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ащата</l>     <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ащо</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ащото</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ащи</l>       <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ащите</l>     <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ах</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>а</l>           <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>а</l>           <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ахме</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ахте</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>аха</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ал</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>алия</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>алият</l>       <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ала</l>       <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>алата</l>     <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ало</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>алото</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>али</l>       <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>алите</l>     <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ейки</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>





	<!-- 2 спрежение, аорист на -АХ -->
	<!-- несвършен вид 
							-->

	<e lm="важи"><i>важ</i><par n="мълч/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="лежи"><i>леж</i><par n="мълч/и__vblex"/></e>
